District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0016.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Strategic Parking Enforcement Enhancement Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Definitions.
For the purposes of this act, the term:
(1) “Agreement” means a written contract, including provisions for the staffing
requirement of the reimbursable details in accordance with subsection (c) of this section, and
compensation of DPW by the eligible entity when reimbursable details are requested by eligible
entity.
(2) “Campus police officer” has the same meaning as provided in D.C. Official
Code § 47-2853.207(1).
(3) “DPW” means the Department of Public Works.
(4) “Eligible entity” means a business, group of businesses, a promoter or
organizer of a District-licensed special event, a Business Improvement District, a DC Main
Streets Program, and other entities designated by the Mayor.


ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
(5) “Reimbursable detail” means an assignment of DPW parking enforcement
officers to patrol a designated area for the purpose of enforcing parking violations and managing
curbside access.
(6) “Special police officer” has the same meaning as provided in D.C. Official
Code § 47-2853.207(6).
Sec. 3. Reimbursable detail for parking enforcement.
(a) An eligible entity may enter into an agreement with DPW to provide for reimbursable
details.
(b) Subject to adequate staffing and an assessment of its staffing requirements, DPW may
staff reimbursable details as requested, provided, that:
(1) DPW shall only use parking enforcement officers for this purpose who are
overtime and would not otherwise be on duty at the time of the reimbursable detail; and
(2) Parking enforcement officers participating in reimbursable details shall
enforce parking restrictions impartially according to their own discretion, and shall remain
subject solely to the direction of their commanding officers unless expressly stated in the
relevant agreement.
(c) Pursuant to funding, the Mayor shall establish a program to subsidize eligible entities
for a portion of reimbursement costs borne by eligible entities for reimbursable detail for parking
enforcement pursuant to this act.
Sec. 4. Parking enforcement by special police officers and campus police officers.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b), special police officers and campus police


ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
officers may conduct parking enforcement activities, including the issuance of parking citations,
regarding vehicles:
(1) On property subject to their jurisdiction;
(2) In areas of the public right of way bordered on both sides by property subject
to their jurisdiction; and
(3) In parking spaces in the public right of way that are reserved for persons
affiliated with or visiting properties subject to their jurisdiction.
(b)(1) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to supersede any other law that
expressly precludes a specific category or organization of special police officers or campus
police officers from enforcing parking violations
(2) The corporation or person at whose request a special police officer or campus
police officer was appointed may direct the special police officer or campus officer not to engage
in parking enforcement and curbside management activities, unless directed otherwise by the
Mayor.
Sec. 5. Rules.
The Mayor, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act,
approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), shall issue rules
to implement the provisions of this act. Such rules may include provisions to facilitate campus
police and special police’s enforcement of the Fraudulent Vehicle Tag and Parking Enforcement
Modernization Amendment Act of 2024, effective May 2, 2025 (D.C. Law 25-325; D.C. Official
Code § 50-2431 et seq.), including provisions to address officer training, the issuance and


ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
adjudication of citations, and revenue-sharing arrangements.
Sec. 6. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 7. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.